Hawaii statutes.
[Part iii.] CONTINUING EDUCATION COURSE
PROVIDERS

§431:9A-151 Continuing education course
provider certificate. (a) An approved continuing education course shall
be offered only by a person who has a valid continuing education course
provider certificate. Any person seeking a continuing education course
provider certificate shall submit to the commissioner at least sixty days prior
to the date the course will be offered:

(1) An application in duplicate on a form prescribed
by the commissioner; and

(2) The appropriate application fee.

(b) A continuing education [course] provider,
who is seeking renewal of the certificate, shall submit to the commissioner at
least sixty days prior to the expiration of the certificate:

(1) A renewal application in duplicate in a form
prescribed by the commissioner; and

(2) The appropriate renewal application fee.

(c) The continuing education course provider
certificate:

(1) Shall expire:

(A) On July 1 of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year the application for the initial
certificate was received, if the application was received in the months of
January through June; or

(B) On July 1 of the second calendar year
following the calendar year the application for the initial certificate was received,
if the application was received in the months of July through December; and

(2) May thereafter be renewed by application for a
period of one year beginning on July 1 and ending on July 1 of the following
calendar year,

unless the certificate is earlier suspended or
revoked by the commissioner.

(d) An application may be denied, or the
continuing education course provider certificate may be suspended or revoked,
if the commissioner determines that the applicant or an officer, director,
partner, or owner of an applicant entity:

(1) Is not qualified to perform the duties and
responsibilities listed in this chapter;

(2) Engaged in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising or in making false or untruthful statements to the public or the
commissioner;

(3) Procured any past license or regulatory approval
through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

(4) Aided and abetted an unlicensed person in
performing, directly or indirectly, any activities requiring a license;

(5) Failed to maintain a record or history of
competency, trustworthiness, fair dealing, or financial integrity;

(6) Engaged in business under a past or present
license issued pursuant to licensing laws, in a matter causing injury to one or
more members of the public;

(7) Failed to comply, observe, or adhere to any law
in a manner such that the commissioner deems the applicant to be unfit for
approval;

(8) Has been refused a professional, occupational, or
vocational license, has had such a license suspended, revoked, or restricted,
or has been fined or placed on probation by any licensing authority; or

(9) Has been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor
involving a fraudulent act or an act of dishonesty in the acceptance, custody,
or payment of money or property. [L 2003, c 55, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 154,
§33]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next